Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending June 30,
2021, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $9,700,000, for distribution to the Oregon
Community Foundation to support emergency shelters through grants to local  community
organizations for  the acquisition, retrofitting and operation of emergency shelters through-
out this state.
SECTION 2. No later than September 15, 2022, the Oregon Community Foundation  shall
provide a report to an appropriate interim committee of the  Legislative Assembly in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245 on the grants provided under section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2004 (HB 2004-B) Page 1
Passed by House June 10, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 17, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2004 (HB 2004-B) Page 2